Utah statutes.
49-11-618.   Members and beneficiaries subject to chapter -- Furnishing of information -- Confidentiality of information.

(1) (a)  Every member, retiree, participant, covered individual, alternate payee, and beneficiary is subject to this chapter, rules made by the board or office, board actions, resolutions, policies, and procedures adopted under this title.

(b)  Each member, retiree, participant, covered individual, alternate payee, and beneficiary shall furnish to the office any information required to carry out the purposes of this title.

(2) (a)  All data in the possession of the office is confidential, and may not be divulged by the office except as permitted by board action.

(b)  All data in the possession of the office or divulged pursuant to board action shall be used for the sole purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this title.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

